Maine, session 132, LD2100.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2469, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A, §96, is
further amended to read:
2. Fuel gas detector required. The building owner shall install, or cause to be
installed, in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements at least one approved fuel
gas detector in every room containing an appliance that combusts propane, natural gas or
any liquefied petroleum gas in:
A. Each unit in any building of multifamily occupancy with 3 or more dwelling units
and each apartment in an apartment building as defined in the National Fire Protection
Association Life Safety Code;
B. A fraternity house, sorority house or dormitory that is affiliated with an educational
facility;
C. A children's home, emergency children's shelter, children's residential care facility,
shelter for homeless children or specialized children's home as defined in Title 22,
section 8101, subsections 1, 2, 4, 4‑A and 5, respectively;
D. A lodging or rooming house, hotel, or dormitory as defined in the National Fire
Protection Association Life Safety Code or a motel or inn;
E. A mixed use occupancy that contains a dwelling unit;
F. Beginning From January 1, 2026 to December 31, 2026, a business occupancy and
beginning January 1, 2027, a business occupancy as defined in the National Fire
Protection Association Life Safety Code;
G. Beginning From January 1, 2026 to December 31, 2026, a mercantile occupancy
and beginning January 1, 2027, a mercantile occupancy as defined in the National Fire
Protection Association Life Safety Code; or
H. Beginning From January 1, 2026 to December 31, 2026, an assembly occupancy.
and beginning January 1, 2027, an assembly occupancy as defined in the National Fire
Protection Association Life Safety Code;
I. Beginning January 1, 2028, a day care occupancy as defined in the National Fire
Protection Association Life Safety Code;
J. Beginning January 1, 2028, an educational occupancy as defined in the National
Fire Protection Association Life Safety Code;
K. Beginning January 1, 2028, a health care occupancy, ambulatory health care
occupancy and residential board and care occupancy as defined in the National Fire
Protection Association Life Safety Code; or
L. Beginning January 1, 2028, a detention and correctional occupancy as defined in
the National Fire Protection Association Life Safety Code.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2469, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Enforcement. This section may be enforced by the Office of the State Fire Marshal;
a state, county or municipal law enforcement officer; a municipal code enforcement officer;
or a state, county or municipal fire inspector.
Page 1 - 132LR2779(01)